Nevada, session 83, AB419.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 532 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
On or before September 15 of each even-numbered year, the
State Engineer shall prepare and submit to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislative
Commission a report of all applications submitted pursuant to
chapters 533 and 534 of NRS that are pending a final decision by
the State Engineer as of the date of the report. The report must
include, without limitation:
1. The number of applications pending a final decision that
have been pending for 2 or more years; and
2. The name of the applicant for each application pending a
final decision that has been pending for 2 or more years, the
primary reason the application is pending a final decision and the
anticipated date a final decision will be made on the application, if
any.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 532.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
532.120 1. The State Engineer may make such reasonable
rules and regulations as may be necessary for the proper and orderly
execution of the powers conferred by law.
2. The State Engineer may adopt regulations, not in conflict
with law, governing the practice and procedure in all contests and
hearings before the Office of the State Engineer, to ensure the
proper and orderly exercise of the powers granted by law, and the
speedy accomplishment of the purposes of chapters 533, 534, 535
and 536 of NRS. Such rules of practice and procedure must be
furnished to any person upon application therefor [.] and must
include, without limitation, rules:
(a) Limiting the evidence presented in a hearing to the subject
matter contained in an application or a protest, as applicable; and
(b) Requiring expert testimony presented in a hearing to
comply with the provisions of NRS 50.275 and 50.285.
-
*AB419_R1*

– 3 –
3. The State Engineer shall adopt regulations to establish a
pre-application review process for the purposes of chapters 533
and 534 of NRS, which must, without limitation:
(a) Include a process for a prospective applicant to request to
meet with the State Engineer or his or her designee; and
(b) Require the State Engineer or his or her designee to, not
later than 15 days after receiving a request pursuant to paragraph
(a), meet with the prospective applicant and review the prospective
application to identify any potential barriers to approval of the
application.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. NRS 233B.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.039 1. The following agencies are entirely exempted
from the requirements of this chapter:
(a) The Governor.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
209.221 and 209.2473, the Department of Corrections.
(c) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) The Office of the Military.
(e) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 368A.140 and 463.765,
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.620, the Division
of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(h) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.390, the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(i) [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 533.365, the Office of
the State Engineer.
(j)] The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry acting to enforce the provisions of
NRS 618.375.
[(k)] (j) The Administrator of the Division of Industrial
Relations of the Department of Business and Industry in
establishing and adjusting the schedule of fees and charges for
accident benefits pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 616C.260.
-
*AB419_R1*

– 4 –
[(l)] (k) The Board to Review Claims in adopting resolutions to
carry out its duties pursuant to NRS 445C.310.
[(m)] (l) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
391.323, the Department of Education, the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education are subject to the provisions of this chapter
for the purpose of adopting regulations but not with respect to any
contested case.
3. The special provisions of:
(a) Chapter 612 of NRS for the adoption of an emergency
regulation or the distribution of regulations by and the judicial
review of decisions of the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(b) Chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for the
determination of contested claims;
(c) Chapter 91 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of the
Administrator of the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
(d) NRS 90.800 for the use of summary orders in contested
cases,
 prevail over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The provisions of NRS 233B.122, 233B.124, 233B.125 and
233B.126 do not apply to the Department of Health and Human
Services in the adjudication of contested cases involving the
issuance of letters of approval for health facilities and agencies.
5. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any order for immediate action, including, but not limited
to, quarantine and the treatment or cleansing of infected or infested
animals, objects or premises, made under the authority of the State
Board of Agriculture, the State Board of Health, or any other agency
of this State in the discharge of a responsibility for the preservation
of human or animal health or for insect or pest control;
(b) An extraordinary regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy
adopted pursuant to NRS 453.2184;
(c) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to NRS 388.255 or 394.1694;
(d) The judicial review of decisions of the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada;
(e) The adoption, amendment or repeal of policies by the
Rehabilitation Division of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation pursuant to NRS 426.561 or 615.178;
(f) The adoption or amendment of a rule or regulation to be
included in the State Plan for Services for Victims of Crime by the
-
*AB419_R1*

– 5 –
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 217.130;
(g) The adoption, amendment or repeal of rules governing the
conduct of contests and exhibitions of unarmed combat by the
Nevada Athletic Commission pursuant to NRS 467.075;
(h) The adoption, amendment or repeal of standards of content
and performance for courses of study in public schools by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools and the
State Board of Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(i) The adoption, amendment or repeal of the statewide plan to
allocate money from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created by
NRS 433.732 established by the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734;
or
(j) The adoption or amendment of a data request by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 687B.404.
6. The State Board of Parole Commissioners is subject to the
provisions of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations but
not with respect to any contested case.
7. The Department of Corrections is subject to the provisions
of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations relating to
fiscal policy, correspondence with inmates and visitation with
inmates of the Department of Corrections.
8. The provisions of subsections 1, 2 and 6 of NRS 233B.121
and the provisions of NRS 233B.124 and 233B.126 to 233B.135,
inclusive, do not apply to the Office of the State Engineer in the
adjudication of contested cases.
Sec. 12. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
H
-
*AB419_R1*